New York, session 2025-2026, S10362.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Nassau is hereby authorized to accept from 3 the Consulate General of El Salvador an application for exemption from 4 real property taxes pursuant to section 418 of the real property tax law 5 with respect to the 2025 assessment roll for a portion of the 2024-2025 6 school taxes and a portion of the 2025 general taxes for the parcel 7 conveyed to such organization located at 111 Express Street, hamlet of 8 Plainview, town of Oyster Bay, county of Nassau, otherwise known as 9 Nassau county parcel ID section 13, block 83, lot 84. If accepted, the 10 application shall be reviewed as if it had been received on or before 11 the taxable status date established for such roll. 12 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 13 such exemption if such organization had filed an application for 14 exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon 15 approval by the Nassau county legislature, may make appropriate 16 correction to the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such 17 organization, therefore, shall have paid any tax with respect to the 18 subject rolls, the applicable governing body or tax department may, in 19 its sole discretion, provide for the refund of those taxes paid and 20 cancel those taxes, fines, penalties, liens or interest remaining 21 unpaid. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15352-01-6